Utah statutes.
78B-6-401.   Jurisdiction of district courts -- Form -- Effect.

 	(1)  Each district court has the power to issue declaratory judgments determining rights, status, and other legal relations within its respective jurisdiction.  An action or proceeding may not be open to objection on the ground that a declaratory judgment or decree is prayed for.

(2)  The declaration may be either affirmative or negative in form and effect and shall have the force and effect of a final judgment or decree.

